New York, session 2025-2026, S3210.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 380.1 of the family court act, as 2 amended by chapter 37 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, where a finding of 5 juvenile delinquency has been entered, upon request, the records 6 pertaining to such case shall be made available to the commissioner of 7 mental health or the commissioner of the office for people with develop- 8 mental disabilities, as appropriate; the case review panel; [and] the 9 attorney general pursuant to section 10.05 of the mental hygiene law; 10 the National Instant Criminal Background Check System in connection with 11 a background check conducted on a person under twenty-two years of age 12 pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(t)(1)(C) and 34 U.S.C. § 40901(1); and the 13 division of state police in connection with a background check conducted 14 on a person under twenty-two years of age pursuant to section two 15 hundred twenty-eight of the executive law. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04799-01-5